Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.311

Candidacy declarations, nominating petitions.

Every person who:

(1) Knowingly provides false information on his or her declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination; or

(2) Conceals or fraudulently defaces or destroys a certificate that has been filed with an elections officer under chapter 29A.20 RCW or a declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination that has been filed with an elections officer, or any part of such a certificate, declaration, or petition, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2004 c 271 s 185.]